test/src/morphology/N-старость_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - старость M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      старость+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: ста́рость
      старость+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: ста́рость
      старость+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: ста́рости
      старость+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: ста́рости
      старость+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: ста́рости
      старость+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: ста́ростью
      старость+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: ста́рости
      старость+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: ста́рости
      старость+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: ста́ростей
      старость+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: ста́ростях
      старость+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: ста́ростям
      старость+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: ста́ростями
